Massachusetts, session 194th, H3047.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of Chapter 64A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the section and inserting in place thereof the
following section:-
Section 13. All sums received from the excise imposed on aviation fuel, and related
penalties, forfeitures, interest, costs of suits and fines, less all amounts for reimbursement under
sections 7 and 7A, shall be credited to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund and may be used
for airport development projects approved and carried out at airports and landing facilities under
49 U.S.C. App. s 2210; and all other sums received from the excise imposed in section 4, and
related penalties, forfeitures, interest, costs of suits and fines, less all amounts for reimbursement
under said sections 7 and 7A, shall be credited as follows: (i) 99.80 per cent shall be credited to
of 2

the Commonwealth Transportation Fund to be used for transportation-related purposes; (ii) 0.15
per cent shall be credited to the Inland Fisheries and Game Fund established in section 2C of
chapter 131; and (iii) 0.05 per cent shall be credited to the Harbors and Inland Waters
Maintenance Fund.
SECTION 2. Chapter 91 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10A the following section: -
Section 10A ¼. There is hereby established a fund to be known as the Harbors and
Inland Waters Maintenance Fund to which shall be credited such sums as are determined the
provisions of section thirteen of chapter sixty four A, sections forty-two, forty-three, forty-five,
forty-six A and forty-nine of chapter ninety-one and any sums received by the commonwealth
from the federal government on account of the activities of the department of conservation and
recreation relative to (a) the continuous maintenance dredging; (b) cleaning of all the areas
within the harbors, inland waters and great ponds of the commonwealth include the removal of
sunken and abandoned vessels, derelict piers and any other obstacles deemed to be hazardous to
navigation; (c) maintenance of state piers; and (d) for the purpose of carrying out the provisions
of section thirty-one. All monies in said fund shall be subject to appropriation, and shall be used
only for the purpose of continuous maintenance dredging and cleaning of harbors, inland waters
and great ponds of the commonwealth, including removal of sunken and abandoned vessels,
derelict piers and any other obstacles deemed to be hazardous to navigation, by the department of
conservation and recreation.
of 2